Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.11
Commercial fertilizers and beneficial substances; sales information; director make available; contents.

The director shall annually make available, in such form as he or she may deem proper, information concerning the sales of commercial fertilizers and beneficial substances and a report of the results of the analysis based on official samples of commercial fertilizers and beneficial substances distributed within the state as compared with the analyses guaranteed under the provisions of the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act.

Laws 1955, c. 334, § 11, p. 1043;

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 12;

Laws, 1992, LB 366, § 31;

Laws 2015, LB93, § 7;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 19.
March 17, 2026